Utah statutes.
23-19-22.6.   Turkey hunting permit -- Use of fee.

(1)  A person, upon paying the turkey permit fee established by the Wildlife Board and possessing a valid hunting or combination license, may apply for or obtain a permit to take turkey as provided by rules and proclamations of the Wildlife Board.

(2)  One dollar of each turkey permit fee collected from a resident shall be used for the hunter education program.



Amended by Chapter 187, 2007 General Session

